Nebraska, session 109, LB927.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1401 Sections 49-1401 to 49-14,142 and sections 3, 4, and 9 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 2. Section 49-1403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1403 For purposes of the Nebraska Political Accountability and
Disclosure Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions
found in sections 49-1404 to 49-1444 and sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall be used.
Sec. 3. Foreign national means:
(1) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States or a
national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for
permanent residence;
(2) A person, other than an individual, organized under the laws of
or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;
(3) A government of a foreign country; or
(4) A political party or political committee established in a
foreign country.
Sec. 4. Preliminary activity includes conducting a poll or focus
group, drafting proposed language, making telephone calls, sending or
receiving electronic mail, and traveling in connection with a ballot
question.
Sec. 5. Section 49-1450, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1450 The statement of organization required by section 49-1449
shall include the following information:
(1) The name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of the
committee. The committee address may be the home address of the candidate
or treasurer of the committee;
-2-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
(2) The name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of each
person, other than an individual, that is a member of the committee;
(3) The full name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of
the treasurer and other principal officers of the committee;
(4) The name and address of the financial institution in which the
official committee depository is located, and the name and address of
each financial institution in which a secondary depository is or is
intended to be located;
(5) The full name of and office sought by each candidate and a brief
statement identifying the substance of each ballot question supported or
opposed by the committee;
(6) Identification of the committee as a candidate committee,
political party committee, independent committee, or ballot question
committee if it is identifiable as such a committee; and
(7) If the committee is identified as a ballot question committee, a
certification that no preliminary activity was directly or indirectly
funded by one or more foreign nationals; and
(8) (7) Such other information as may be required by the rules and
regulations of the commission.
Sec. 6. Section 49-1461, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1461 (1) In addition to the campaign statements required to be
filed pursuant to sections 49-1459 and 49-1462, a ballot question
committee shall file a campaign statement as required by the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act according to the following
schedule:
(a) (1) The first campaign statement shall be filed within ten days
after the end of the calendar month in which the petition form is filed
with the Secretary of State pursuant to section 32-1405. The closing date
for the campaign statement shall be the last day of such calendar month;
(b) (2) Additional campaign statements shall be filed within ten
-3-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
days after the end of each calendar month thereafter except for the
calendar month during which the signed petitions must be filed with the
Secretary of State as provided in section 32-1407. The closing date for
such campaign statements shall be the last day of each such calendar
month; and
(c) (3) A final campaign statement shall be filed not later than
thirty days after the deadline for filing petitions with the Secretary of
State as provided in section 32-1407. The closing date for the campaign
statement shall be twenty-five days after the deadline for filing such
petitions.
(2) Any campaign statement filed by a ballot question committee
pursuant to this section or section 49-1459 or 49-1462 shall include a
certification by the committee's treasurer affirming that the donor
associated with each contribution is not a foreign national and has not
intentionally received, solicited, or accepted, whether directly or
indirectly, contributions or expenditures aggregating in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars from one or more foreign nationals within the
four-year period immediately preceding the date of the contribution.
(3) The campaign statements required to be filed pursuant to this
section shall be filed whether or not petitions have or will be filed
with the Secretary of State. Any person who fails to file a campaign
statement with the commission pursuant to this section shall be subject
to late filing fees as provided in section 49-1463.
Sec. 7. Section 49-1467, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1467 (1) Any person, other than a committee, who makes an
independent expenditure advocating the election of a candidate or the
defeat of a candidate's opponents or the qualification, passage, or
defeat of a ballot question, which is in an amount of more than two
hundred fifty dollars, shall file a report of the independent
expenditure, within ten days, with the commission.
-4-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
(2) The report shall be made on an independent expenditure report
form provided by the commission and shall include the date of the
expenditure, a brief description of the nature of the expenditure, the
amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom it
was paid, the name and address of the person filing the report, and the
name, address, occupation, employer, and principal place of business of
each person who contributed more than two hundred fifty dollars to the
expenditure.
(3) Any person required under this section to file a report for an
independent expenditure advocating for the qualification, passage, or
defeat of a ballot question shall include an accompanying certification
with such report affirming that no funds have been intentionally accepted
aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars from one or more
foreign nationals within the four-year period immediately preceding the
date the expenditure was made.
(4) (3) Any person who fails to file a report of an independent
expenditure with the commission shall pay to the commission a late filing
fee of twenty-five dollars for each day the statement remains not filed
in violation of this section, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars.
(5) (4) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a
Class IV misdemeanor.
Sec. 8. Section 49-1479.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1479.03 (1) For purposes of this section, foreign national
means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States or a
national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for
permanent residence;
(b) A person, other than an individual, organized under the laws of
or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;
(c) A government of a foreign country; or
-5-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
(d) A political party or political committee established in a
foreign country.
(1) (2) It shall be unlawful for a foreign national, directly or
indirectly, to make a contribution to a ballot question committee or for
a ballot question committee to solicit, accept, or receive such a
contribution.
(2) It shall be unlawful for a foreign national to directly or
indirectly make an expenditure to support or oppose the qualification,
passage, or defeat of a ballot question.
(3) It shall be unlawful for a foreign national to directly or
indirectly solicit the making of a contribution or expenditure by another
person or committee to support or oppose the qualification, passage, or
defeat of a ballot question.
(4) It shall be unlawful for a foreign national to direct, dictate,
control, or directly or indirectly participate in the decisionmaking
process of any person or committee regarding that person's or committee's
activities to support or oppose the qualification, passage, or defeat of
a ballot question, including decisions concerning the making of
contributions or expenditures.
(5) (3) A person, other than an individual, organized under the laws
of the United States which is a domestic subsidiary of a foreign national
may make a contribution or an expenditure to support or oppose the
qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question ballot if:
(a) The person is a discrete entity organized under the laws of any
state within the United States and its principal place of business is
within the United States;
(b) The foreign national parent does not finance election-related
contributions or expenditures either directly or through such person,
including through subsidizing the person's business operations, unless
the person can demonstrate by a reasonable accounting method that it has
sufficient funds from its own domestic operations to make any
-6-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
contributions or expenditures; and
(c) All decisions concerning the administration of the person's
contributions or expenditures are made by citizens or permanent residents
of the United States.
(6) Upon a ballot question committee's receipt of a contribution,
the committee treasurer shall obtain from the donor an affirmation that
the donor is not a foreign national and has not intentionally accepted
funds aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars from one or
more foreign nationals within the four-year period immediately preceding
the date the contribution is made.
(7)(a) A ballot question committee violating subsection (1) of this
section shall be fined the amount of the prohibited contribution or one
hundred thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(b) A foreign national that made (i) a contribution to a ballot
question committee or a person who made a contribution or expenditure on
behalf of a foreign national or (ii) an expenditure in violation of this
section shall be fined the amount of the prohibited contribution or
expenditure plus one hundred thousand dollars.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create or eliminate
any existing donor disclosure rights or duties beyond those specifically
enumerated.
(9) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 9. Any investigation of an alleged violation of the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act or a court order in an action
brought under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act
shall occur in a manner that shields the identity of lawful donors as
much as reasonably possible. No state or local government entity, court,
or officer of a court may collect or require the submission of
information on the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt organization
other than information directly related to an alleged violation of the
-7-

LB927 LB927
2026 2026
Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 10. Original sections 49-1403, 49-1450, and 49-1467, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 49-1401, 49-1461, and
49-1479.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-